test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-0i-tsidiitla_run-away_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - tsídiitł'á[run-away] :
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       tsídistł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       tsídíítł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       tsídiitł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [tsídiìtł'á, tsídaàtł'á]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàtsídiìtł'á, dàtsídaàtł'á]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       tsídastł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: dàtsídastł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       tsígídiitł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: dàtsígídiitł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       tsíts'ídiitł'á
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: dàtsíts'ídiitł'á
